Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.281

Select committee on pension policy—Powers and duties.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5168-S.SL) ***

The select committee on pension policy has the following powers and duties:

(1) Study pension issues, develop pension policies for public employees in state retirement systems, and make recommendations to the legislature;

(2) Study the financial condition of the state pension systems, develop funding policies, and make recommendations to the legislature;

(3) Consult with the chair and vice chair on appointing members to the state actuary appointment committee upon the convening of the state actuary appointment committee established under RCW 44.44.013; and

(4) Receive the results of the actuarial audits of the actuarial valuations and experience studies administered by the pension funding council pursuant to RCW 41.45.110. The select committee on pension policy shall study and make recommendations on changes to assumptions or contribution rates to the pension funding council prior to adoption of changes under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, or 41.45.060.

[ 2003 c 295 s 5.]